Utah statutes.
76-2-204.   Criminal responsibility of corporation or association.

A corporation or association is guilty of an offense when:

(1)  The conduct constituting the offense consists of an omission to discharge a specific duty of affirmative performance imposed on corporations or associations by law; or

(2)  The conduct constituting the offense is authorized, solicited, requested, commanded, or undertaken, performed, or recklessly tolerated by the board of directors or by a high managerial agent acting within the scope of his employment and in behalf of the corporation or association.

